Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.040

Compensation and travel expenses.

Commission members and alternate members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1984 c 287 s 8; 1981 c 268 s 5.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.